Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.420

Electronic wills—Applicable law.

An electronic will is a will for all purposes of the law of this state. The law of this state applicable to wills and principles of equity apply to an electronic will, except as modified by RCW 11.12.400 through 11.12.491.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1003.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.